Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.091

Mutual aid and interlocal agreements—Requirements.

(1) The director of each local organization for emergency management may, in collaboration with other public and private agencies within this state, develop or cause to be developed mutual aid arrangements for reciprocal emergency management aid and assistance in case of disaster too great to be dealt with unassisted. Such arrangements must be consistent with the state emergency management plan and program, and in time of emergency it is the duty of each local organization for emergency management to render assistance in accordance with the provisions of such mutual aid arrangements. The adjutant general shall maintain and distribute a mutual aid and interlocal agreement handbook.

(2) The adjutant general and the director of each local organization for emergency management may, subject to the approval of the governor, enter into mutual aid arrangements with emergency management agencies or organizations in other states for reciprocal emergency management aid and assistance in case of disaster too great to be dealt with unassisted. All such arrangements must contain the language and provisions in subsection (3) of this section.

(3) Mutual aid and interlocal agreements must include the following:

Purpose

The purpose must state the reason the mutual aid or interlocal agreement or compact is coordinated, the parties to the agreement or compact, and the assistance to be provided.

Authorization

Article I, section 10 of the Constitution of the United States permits a state to enter into an agreement or compact with another state, subject to the consent of Congress. Congress, through enactment of Title 50 U.S.C. Sections 2281(g), 2283 and the Executive Department, by issuance of Executive Orders No. 10186 of December 1, 1950, encourages the states to enter into emergency, disaster and civil defense mutual aid agreements or pacts.

Implementation

The conditions that guide the agreement or compacts may include, but are not limited to:

(a) A statement of which authority or authorities are authorized to request and receive assistance and the conditions that must exist for the request or receipt of assistance.

(b) A statement of how the requests for assistance may be made, what documentation of the request is required, the specifics of any details included in the request, and the required approval for the request.

(c) A statement of the direction and control relationship between the personnel and equipment provided by the jurisdiction to the requester and the requirements of the requester to coordinate the activities of the jurisdiction providing the assets.

(d) A statement of the circumstances by which the assisting jurisdiction may withdraw support from the requester and the method by which this is to be communicated.

General Fiscal Provisions

The terms of reimbursement must be stated defining the relationship between the requesting jurisdiction and the aiding jurisdiction, when reimbursement will be made, and details of the claim for reimbursement. The provisions may include statements that discuss but are not limited to:

(a) A statement of what costs are incurred by the requesting jurisdiction.

(b) A statement of what costs and compensation benefits are made to individuals from the aiding jurisdiction by the requesting jurisdiction.

Privileges and Immunities

The conditions and immunities that are enjoyed by the individuals from the aiding jurisdiction to the requesting jurisdiction must be stated. These provisions may include but are not limited to:

(a) A statement of the privileges and immunities from liability and the law an employee of a supporting jurisdiction enjoys while supporting the requesting jurisdiction.

(b) A statement of the privileges and immunities from liability and the law a volunteer from a supporting jurisdiction enjoys while supporting the requesting jurisdiction.

(c) A statement on the use of the national guard between the requesting and supporting jurisdictions.

(d) A hold harmless agreement between the signatory jurisdictions.

(e) The precedence this agreement takes with existing agreements.

(f) A time line by which information required by the agreement is exchanged and updated annually.

(g) The time in which the agreement becomes effective.

(h) The time and conditions when a signatory may withdraw and render the agreement ineffective.

[ 1997 c 195 s 1.]